District of Columbia statutes.
1-752

Application of procedure.

(a)

The procedure established by this subchapter shall apply to any participant or beneficiary who has a claim for benefits denied under the District of Columbia Police Officers and Fire Fighters’ Retirement Fund, established by § 1-712; the District of Columbia Teachers’ Retirement Fund, established by § 1-713; and the District of Columbia Judges’ Retirement Fund, established by § 1-714.

(b)

The procedure established by this subchapter shall apply to claims for benefits denied after March 1, 1982.

Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 192
as added July 2, 1982, D.C. Law 4-123, § 3, 29 DCR 2084
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 33(d), 51 DCR 881
D.C. Law 15-105 validated a previously made technical correction.
1981 Ed., § 1-752.